Florida, session 2026, SB1582.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsections (1), (6), and (8) of section 538.04, 15 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 538.04âRecordkeeping requirements; penalties.â 17 (1)âA secondhand dealer shall complete a secondhand dealers 18 transaction form at the time of the actual transaction. A 19 secondhand dealer shall maintain a copy of a completed 20 transaction form on the registered premises for at least 1 year 21 after the date of the transaction. However, the secondhand 22 dealer shall maintain a copy of the transaction form for not 23 less than 3 years. Unless other arrangements are agreed upon by 24 the secondhand dealer and the appropriate law enforcement 25 official, the secondhand dealer shall, within 24 hours after 26 acquiring any secondhand goods, deliver to such official and the 27 Department of Law Enforcement a record of the transaction on a 28 form approved by the Department of Law Enforcement for the 29 purpose of statewide data sharing. Such record must shall 30 contain all of the following: 31 (a)âThe time, date, and place of the transaction. 32 (b)âA complete and accurate description of the goods 33 acquired, including the following information, if applicable: 34 1.âBrand name. 35 2.âModel number. 36 3.âManufacturerâs serial number. 37 4.âSize. 38 5.âColor, as apparent to the untrained eye. 39 6.âPrecious metal type, weight, and content if known. 40 7.âGemstone description, including the number of stones, if 41 applicable. 42 8.âIn the case of firearms, the type of action, caliber or 43 gauge, number of barrels, barrel length, and finish. 44 9.âAny other unique identifying marks, numbers, or letters. 45 (c)âDigital photographs of the goods, clearly showing the 46 items required to be included on the record as provided in 47 paragraph (b). 48 (d)âA description of the person from whom the goods were 49 acquired, including: 50 1.âFull name, current residential address, workplace, and 51 home and work phone numbers. 52 2.âHeight, weight, date of birth, race, gender, hair color, 53 eye color, and any other identifying marks. 54 3.âThe right thumbprint, free of smudges and smears, of the 55 person from whom the goods were acquired. 56 (e)âAny other information required by the form approved by 57 the Department of Law Enforcement. 58 (6)âIf the appropriate law enforcement official supplies a 59 secondhand dealer with appropriate software and the secondhand 60 dealer has computer capability, the secondhand dealer must 61 electronically transmit secondhand dealer transactions required 62 by this section to such official and the Department of Law 63 Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data sharing. If a 64 secondhand dealer does not have computer capability, the 65 appropriate law enforcement official may provide the secondhand 66 dealer with a computer and all equipment necessary to 67 electronically transmit secondhand dealer transactions. The 68 appropriate law enforcement official shall retain ownership of 69 the computer, unless otherwise agreed upon, and the secondhand 70 dealer shall maintain the computer in good working order, except 71 for ordinary wear. A secondhand dealer who transmits secondhand 72 dealer transactions electronically is not required to also 73 deliver the original or paper copies of the secondhand 74 transaction forms to the appropriate law enforcement official or 75 the Department of Law Enforcement for the purpose of statewide 76 data sharing. However, such official may, for purposes of a 77 criminal investigation, request the secondhand dealer to deliver 78 the original transaction form that was electronically 79 transmitted. The secondhand dealer shall deliver the form to the 80 appropriate law enforcement official and the Department of Law 81 Enforcement within 24 hours after receipt of the request. 82 (8)âWhen secondhand goods are purchased by means of an 83 automated kiosk, the serial number reported pursuant to this 84 section may be the International Mobile Station Equipment 85 Identity (IMEI), the mobile equipment identifier (MEID), or 86 another unique identifying number assigned to the device by the 87 manufacturer. If the IMEI, MEID, or other unique identifying 88 number is not available at the time of receipt or purchase, the 89 report filed pursuant to this section must be updated with the 90 IMEI, MEID, or other unique identifying number as soon as 91 possible, but no later than 10 business days after the date of 92 acquisition. If such identifying numbers are not available at 93 the time of the transaction, the business must shall assign 94 another unique identifier to the item which directly associates 95 the item to the transaction that it was purchased in. Upon 96 entering or updating any information on the transaction form, a 97 law enforcement official, as designated by the sheriff or the 98 chief of police of the jurisdiction in which the item was 99 purchased, must be timely notified in writing or by electronic 100 means, as required by the sheriff or chief of police of the 101 jurisdiction. If, upon receiving the device and correcting the 102 missing information, the company finds that the item was 103 misappropriated or stolen, the appropriate law enforcement 104 official and the Department of Law Enforcement must be notified. 105 The holding requirements of ss. 538.06 and 538.09(3) do not 106 begin until all required reports are complete and submitted to 107 the appropriate law enforcement official and the Department of 108 Law Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data sharing. 109 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 538.19, Florida 110 Statutes, is amended to read: 111 538.19âRecords required; limitation of liability.â 112 (1)âA secondary metals recycler shall maintain a legible 113 paper record of all purchase transactions to which such 114 secondary metals recycler is a party. A secondary metals 115 recycler shall also maintain a legible electronic record, in the 116 English language, of all such purchase transactions. The 117 appropriate law enforcement official may provide data 118 specifications regarding the electronic record format, but such 119 format must be approved by the Department of Law Enforcement. An 120 electronic record of a purchase transaction shall be 121 electronically transmitted to the appropriate law enforcement 122 official and the Department of Law Enforcement for the purpose 123 of statewide data sharing no later than 10 a.m. of the business 124 day following the date of the purchase transaction. The record 125 transmitted to the appropriate law enforcement official and the 126 Department of Law Enforcement must not contain the price paid 127 for the items. A secondary metals recycler who transmits such 128 records electronically is not required to also deliver the 129 original or paper copies of the transaction forms to the 130 appropriate law enforcement official or the Department of Law 131 Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data sharing. However, 132 such official may, for purposes of a criminal investigation, 133 request the secondary metals recycler to make available the 134 original transaction form that was electronically transmitted. 135 This original transaction form must include the price paid for 136 the items. The secondary metals recycler shall make the form 137 available to the appropriate law enforcement official within 24 138 hours after receipt of the request. 139 Section 3.âSubsections (3), (4), and (6) and paragraph (d) 140 of subsection (7) of section 538.32, Florida Statutes, are 141 amended to read: 142 538.32âRegistration, transaction, and recordkeeping 143 requirements; penalties.â 144 (3)âFor every transaction, the secondhand dealer shall must 145 keep a record of the following: 146 (a)âA complete and accurate description of the sellerâs 147 goods, including: 148 1.âPrecious metal type, or, if jewelry, the type of 149 jewelry. 150 2.âAny other unique identifying marks, numbers, or letters. 151 The description must be in an electronic format agreed upon by 152 the dealer and the appropriate law enforcement agency. 153 (b)âThe date that the sellerâs goods were received by the 154 mail-in secondhand precious metals dealer. 155 156 This information must be provided to the appropriate law 157 enforcement agency and the Department of Law Enforcement for the 158 purpose of statewide data sharing within 24 hours after entering 159 into the contract unless other arrangements are made between the 160 business and the law enforcement agency. 161 (4)âFor every transaction, pictures of the secondhand goods 162 which are the subject of the transaction must be available 163 online for electronic viewing, via a website accessible by 164 username and password only, by a law enforcement agency and the 165 Department of Law Enforcement at no charge. In addition, the 166 electronic files must be searchable by a law enforcement agency 167 for queries concerning property descriptions, secondhand dealer 168 transaction information, and the sellerâs personal 169 identification, including address, state of residence, and zip 170 code. 171 (6)âThe mail-in secondhand precious metals dealer shall 172 must provide the appropriate law enforcement agency and the 173 Department of Law Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data 174 sharing with an electronic copy of the name, address, phone 175 number, driver license number, or government-issued 176 identification number, and issuing state of the person from whom 177 the dealer purchased or acquired the precious metals or jewelry. 178 (7) 179 (d)âWithin 24 hours after the expiration of the 30-day hold 180 period for the property, the secondhand dealer shall must notify 181 the appropriate law enforcement agency and the Department of Law 182 Enforcement of the abandonment of the property by electronic 183 transmission or by sending a copy of the completed form 184 authorized by chapter 717 to the Department of Financial 185 Services, Division of Unclaimed Property. 186 Section 4.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (9) of 187 section 539.001, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 188 539.001âThe Florida Pawnbroking Act.â 189 (9)âRECORDKEEPING; REPORTING; HOLD PERIOD.â 190 (a)âA pawnbroker shall must maintain a copy of each 191 completed pawnbroker transaction form on the pawnshop premises 192 for at least 1 year after the date of the transaction. On or 193 before the end of each business day, the pawnbroker shall must 194 deliver to the appropriate law enforcement official and the 195 Department of Law Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data 196 sharing the original printed pawnbroker transaction forms or 197 printed copies of the digital pawnbroker transaction forms for 198 each of the transactions occurring during the previous business 199 day, unless other arrangements have been agreed upon between the 200 pawnbroker and the appropriate law enforcement official. If an 201 original printed transaction form is lost or destroyed by the 202 appropriate law enforcement official, a copy may be used by the 203 pawnbroker as evidence in court. When an electronic image of a 204 pledgor or seller identification is accepted for a transaction, 205 the pawnbroker must maintain the electronic image in order to 206 meet the same recordkeeping requirements as for the original 207 printed transaction form. If a criminal investigation occurs, 208 the pawnbroker must shall, upon request, provide a clear and 209 legible copy of the image to the appropriate law enforcement 210 official. 211 (b)âIf the appropriate law enforcement agency supplies the 212 appropriate software and the pawnbroker presently has the 213 computer ability, pawn transactions must shall be electronically 214 transferred to the appropriate law enforcement official and the 215 Department of Law Enforcement for the purpose of statewide data 216 sharing. If a pawnbroker does not presently have the computer 217 ability, the appropriate law enforcement agency may provide the 218 pawnbroker with a computer and all necessary equipment for the 219 purpose of electronically transferring pawn transactions. The 220 appropriate law enforcement agency retains shall retain 221 ownership of the computer, unless otherwise agreed upon. The 222 pawnbroker shall maintain the computer in good working order, 223 ordinary wear and tear excepted. In the event the pawnbroker 224 transfers pawn transactions electronically, the pawnbroker is 225 not required to also deliver to the appropriate law enforcement 226 official or the Department of Law Enforcement the original or 227 copies of the pawnbroker transaction forms. The appropriate law 228 enforcement official may, for the purposes of a criminal 229 investigation, request that the pawnbroker produce an original 230 of a printed transaction form that has been electronically 231 transferred. The pawnbroker shall deliver this form to the 232 appropriate law enforcement official within 24 hours of the 233 request. 234 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.